Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,108
Death of tenant; effect.

(1) If a tenant who is not the sole owner of a mobile home dies during the term of a rental agreement, the surviving joint tenant or tenant in common in the mobile home shall have all rights, privileges, and liabilities the same as the deceased tenant had.

(2) If a tenant who is the sole owner of a mobile home dies during the term of a rental agreement, the tenant's heirs or legal representative, or the landlord, may cancel the tenant's lease by giving thirty days' notice to the other, and the heirs or legal representative shall have the same rights, privileges, and liabilities as the tenant had.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 59.